Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20261-117
Certified public accountant; completion of examination; additional requirements.

Any person who has successfully completed the examination described in section 1-114 shall have no status as a certified public accountant unless and until such person has the requisite education and experience and also has been issued a certificate and permit as a certified public accountant.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 12, p. 59;

Laws 1976, LB 619, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB718, § 3.
July 18, 2026